apertium-olo-fin.olo.lexc
LEXICON INDPRSPL1
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl1%>:%^WEAK%>mmO1 K ;
LEXICON INDPRSPL2
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl2%>:%^WEAK%>ttO1 K ;
LEXICON INDPRSPL3_jAh
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl3%>:%>jA1h K ;
LEXICON INDPRSPL3_dAh
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl3%>:%>dA1%^WEAKh K ;
LEXICON INDPRSPL3_tAh
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl3%>:%^WEAK%>tA1h K ;
LEXICON INDPRSPL3_EtAh
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl3%>:%^WEAK%^E1%>tA1h K ;
LEXICON INDPRSCONNEG
%<ind%>%<prs%>%<conneg%>:%^WEAK K ;

LEXICON INDPRTSG1
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scsg1%>:%>i%^WEAK%>n K ;
LEXICON INDPRTSG2
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scsg2%>:%>i%^WEAK%>t K ;
LEXICON INDPRTSG3
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scsg3%>:%>i K ;
LEXICON INDPRTPL1
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scpl1%>:%>i%^WEAK%>mmO1 K ;
LEXICON INDPRTPL2
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scpl2%>:%>i%^WEAK%>ttO1 K ;
LEXICON INDPRTPL3_dih
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scpl3%>:%>dih K ;
LEXICON INDPRTPL3_tih
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scpl3%>:%^WEAK%>tih K ;
LEXICON INDPRTPL3_Etih
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scpl3%>:%^WEAK%^E1%>tih K ;
LEXICON INDPRTPL3_ttih
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scpl3%>:%^WEAK%>ttih K ;
LEXICON INDPRTPL3_Ettih
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<scpl3%>:%^WEAK%^E1%>ttih K ;
LEXICON INDPRTSGCONNEG
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<sg%>%<conneg%>:%^WEAK K ;
LEXICON INDPRTCONNEG_nnuh
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<conneg%>:%^WEAK%>nnU1h K ;
LEXICON INDPRTCONNEGPL3_ttu
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<conneg%>%<scpl3%>:%^WEAK%>ttU1 K ;
LEXICON INDPRTCONNEGPL3_Ettu
%<ind%>%<prt%>%<conneg%>%<scpl3%>:%^WEAK%^E1%>ttU1 K ;


!! Conditional
LEXICON CONDPRS
%<cond%>%<prs%>%<scsg1%>:%>izin K ;
%<cond%>%<prs%>%<scsg2%>:%>izit K ;
%<cond%>%<prs%>%<scsg3%>:%>is K ;
%<cond%>%<prs%>%<scsg3%>:%>iz K ;
%<cond%>%<prs%>%<scpl1%>:%>izimmO1 K ;
%<cond%>%<prs%>%<scpl2%>:%>izittO1 K ;

LEXICON CONDPRSPL3
%<cond%>%<prs%>%<scpl3%>:A1is K ;


LEXICON CONDPRT
%<cond%>%<prt%>%<scsg1%>:%>zin K ;
%<cond%>%<prt%>%<scsg2%>:%>zit K ;
%<cond%>%<prt%>%<scsg3%>:%>z K ;
%<cond%>%<prt%>%<scpl1%>:%>zimmO1 K ;
%<cond%>%<prt%>%<scpl2%>:%>zittO1 K ;

LEXICON CONDPRTPL3
%<cond%>%<prt%>%<scpl3%>:%>nU1s K ;





!! Proper noun inflection
!! ----------------------
!! The UNDEFINED language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.


LEXICON PROP_ !!= @CODE@ 
%<tyä%>%<prop%>: N_ ;

LEXICON PROP_KARJAL !!= @CODE@ 
%<n%>%<prop%>: NMN_KARJAL ;

LEXICON PROP_KUU !!= @CODE@ 
%<n%>%<prop%>: NMN_KUU ;

LEXICON PROP_KALA !!= @CODE@ 
%<n%>%<prop%>: NMN_KALA ;

LEXICON PROP_ARTELI !!= @CODE@ 
%<n%>%<prop%>: NMN_ARTELI ;

LEXICON PROP_ANUS !!= @CODE@ Anus:Anuks
%<n%>%<prop%>: NMN_ANUS ;




!! Pronoun inflection
!! ---------------
!! Livvi pronouns inflect for case.

LEXICON PERS_
%<pron%>%<pers%>: # ;


LEXICON PERS-SG1
! minä:min
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>%<nom%>:ä # ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>%<gen%>:un # ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>%<com%>:unke K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>%<par%>:uu K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>%<all%>:ule K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>%<ade%>:ul K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>%<ine%>:us K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>%<apr%>:ulluo K ;

LEXICON PERS-SG2
! sinä:sin
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>%<nom%>:ä K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>%<gen%>:un K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>%<com%>:unke K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>%<par%>:uu K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>%<all%>:ule K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>%<ade%>:ul K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>%<ine%>:us K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>%<apr%>:ulluo K ;

LEXICON PERS-SG3
! häi:hä
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg3%>%<nom%>:i K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg3%>%<gen%>:nen K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg3%>%<com%>:nenke K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg3%>%<ade%>:nel K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg3%>%<all%>:nele K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg3%>%<ine%>:nes K ;

LEXICON PERS-PL1
! myö:m
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>%<nom%>:yö K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>%<gen%>:eijän K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>%<acc%>:eijät K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>%<com%>:eijänke K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>%<par%>:eidy K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>%<ade%>:eil K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>%<all%>:eile K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>%<ine%>:eis K ;

LEXICON PERS-PL2
! työ:t
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>%<nom%>:yö K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>%<gen%>:eijän K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>%<acc%>:eijät K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>%<com%>:eijänke K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>%<par%>:eidy K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>%<ade%>:eil K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>%<all%>:eile K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>%<ine%>:eis K ;

LEXICON PERS-PL3
! hyö:h
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>%<nom%>:yö K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>%<gen%>:eijän K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>%<acc%>:eijät K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>%<com%>:eijänke K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>%<par%>:eidy K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>%<ade%>:eil K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>%<all%>:eile K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>%<ine%>:eis K ;



LEXICON PRON_
%<pron%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON_SE
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:e K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:en K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:il K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<all%>:ille K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ildy K ;

LEXICON PRON_NET
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:et K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:iilöin K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<com%>:iilöinke K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<par%>:iilöi K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ade%>:iilöil K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<all%>:iilöile K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ine%>:iilöis K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ill%>:iilöih K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<dep%>%<pl%>%<ade%>:iil K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<dep%>%<pl%>%<all%>:iile K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<dep%>%<pl%>%<ine%>:iis K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<dep%>%<pl%>%<ill%>:iih K ;

LEXICON PRON_KARJALAINE
%<pron%>%<interr%>: NMN_KARJALAINE ;

LEXICON nouns
kai:kai PRON_  ;
kugalaine:kugala PRON_KARJALAINE  ;
LEXICON pronouns
buitekui:buitekui PRON_  ;
eulo% kunne:eulo% kunne PRON_  ;
eulo% kus:eulo% kus PRON_  ;
ga:ga PRON_  ;
gu:gu PRON_  ;
gu:gu PRON_  ;
hyö:h PERS-PL3  ;
häi:hä PERS-SG3  ;
iče:iče PRON_  ;
jalles:jalles PRON_  ;
jöngöi:jöngöi PRON_  ;
kel:kel PRON_  ;
ken:ken PRON_  ;
ken-ollou:ken-ollou PRON_  ;
ken-tahto:ken-tahto PRON_  ;
kenen:kenen PRON_  ;
keral:keral PRON_  ;
keralle:keralle PRON_  ;
kui:kui PRON_  ;
kunne-ollou:kunne-ollou PRON_  ;
kunne-tahto:kunne-tahto PRON_  ;
kunnepäi:kunnepäi PRON_  ;
kunnie:kunnie PRON_  ;
meile:meile PRON_  ;
mi:mi PRON_  ;
mi:mi PRON_  ;
mi:mi PRON_  ;
midä:midä PRON_  ;
midä:midä PRON_  ;
midä-tahto:midä-tahto PRON_  ;
mie:mie PERS_  ;
migäli:migäli PRON_  ;
mikse:mikse PRON_  ;
mikse:mikse PRON_  ;
mil:mil PRON_  ;
milleh:milleh PRON_  ;
mindäh:mindäh PRON_  ;
minulle:minulle PERS_  ;
minun:minun PERS_  ;
minuu:minuu PERS_  ;
minä:min PERS-SG1  ;
mistöi:mistöi PRON_  ;
molembat:molembat PRON_  ;
mollei:mollei PRON_  ;
muga:muga PRON_  ;
myö:m PERS-PL1  ;
nenne:nenne PRON_  ;
net:n PRON_NET  ;
netai:netai PRON_  ;
netualleh:netualleh PRON_  ;
netuane:netuane PRON_  ;
netuas:netuas PRON_  ;
netäs:netäs PRON_  ;
neče:neče PRON_  ;
nečie:nečie PRON_  ;
nečilleh:nečilleh PRON_  ;
nečine:nečine PRON_  ;
nečiz:nečiz PRON_  ;
ni% mi:ni% mi PRON_  ;
ni% mistöi:ni% mistöi PRON_  ;
nikudai:nikudai PRON_  ;
nikus:nikus PRON_  ;
nikuspäi:nikuspäi PRON_  ;
nimidä:nimidä PRON_  ;
nämmä:nämmä PRON_  ;
peräs:peräs PRON_  ;
piäl:piäl PRON_  ;
samanmoine:samanmoine PRON_  ;
se:s PRON_SE  ;
sego:sego PRON_  ;
semmoine:semmoine PRON_  ;
semmoine:semmoine PRON_  ;
sendäh:sendäh PRON_  ;
senäi:senäi PRON_  ;
sežo:sežo PRON_  ;
sid:sid PRON_  ;
sidä:sidä PRON_  ;
sie:sie PERS_  ;
sigäli:sigäli PRON_  ;
sih:sih PRON_  ;
sih:sih PRON_  ;
sih:sih PRON_  ;
sillo:sillo PRON_  ;
sinne:sinne PRON_  ;
sinnembä:sinnembä PRON_  ;
sinnembäine:sinnembäine PRON_  ;
sinule:sinule PERS_  ;
sinun:sinun PERS_  ;
sinuu:sinuu PERS_  ;
sinä:sin PERS-SG2  ;
sinäpäin:sinäpäin PRON_  ;
tagah:tagah PRON_  ;
tagah:tagah PRON_  ;
taganpäi:taganpäi PRON_  ;
tagači:tagači PRON_  ;
toiči:toiči PRON_  ;
tuakse:tuakse PRON_  ;
tuo:tuo PRON_  ;
tuo:tuo PRON_  ;
tyveh:tyveh PRON_  ;
työ:t PERS-PL2  ;
tämä:tämä PRON_  ;
tämänmoine:tämänmoine PRON_  ;
tänne:tänne PRON_  ;
tännepäi:tännepäi PRON_  ;
uaže:uaže PRON_  ;
vaiku:vaiku PRON_  ;
valdua:valdua PRON_  ;
vaste-vai:vaste-vai PRON_  ;
viereh:viereh PRON_  ;
viereh:viereh PRON_  ;
vieres:vieres PRON_  ;
vikse:vikse PRON_  ;
vot:vot PRON_  ;
vuoh:vuoh PRON_  ;
vähilleh:vähilleh PRON_  ;
yli:yli PRON_  ;
ynnä:ynnä PRON_  ;
äski:äski PRON_  ;
